Maryland, session 2025, HB0644.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *hb0644*

HOUSE BILL 644
21–101.
(a) In this title and Title 25 of this article the following words have the meanings
indicated.
(s) “Residential district” means an area that:
(1) Is not a business district; and
(2) Adjoins and includes a highway where the property along the highway,
for a distance of at least 300 feet, is improved mainly with residences or residences and
buildings used for business.
21–809.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(8) “Speed monitoring system” means a device with one or more motor
vehicle sensors producing recorded images of motor vehicles traveling at speeds at least 12
miles per hour above the posted speed limit.
(b) (1) (i) A speed monitoring system may not be used in a local jurisdiction
under this section unless its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction
by local law enacted after reasonable notice and a public hearing.
(vi) This section applies to a violation of this subtitle recorded by a
speed monitoring system that meets the requirements of this subsection and has been
placed:
1. [In Anne Arundel County, Montgomery County, or Prince
George’s County, on] ON a highway in a residential district, as defined in § 21–101 of this
title, with a maximum posted speed limit of 35 miles per hour, which speed limit was
established using generally accepted traffic engineering practices;
2. In a school zone with a posted speed limit of at least 20
miles per hour;
3. In Prince George’s County:
A. Subject to subparagraph (vii)1 of this paragraph, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway); or
B. On that part of a highway located within the grounds of
an institution of higher education as defined in § 10–101(h) of the Education Article, or
within one–half mile of the grounds of a building or property used by the institution of
higher education where generally accepted traffic and engineering practices indicate that

HOUSE BILL 644 3
motor vehicle, pedestrian, or bicycle traffic is substantially generated or influenced by the
institution of higher education;
4. Subject to subparagraph (vii)2 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City;
5. In Anne Arundel County, on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line; or
6. Subject to subparagraph (vii)3 of this paragraph, at the
intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County.
(viii) Before activating a speed monitoring system, the local
jurisdiction shall:
1. Publish notice of the location of the speed monitoring
system on its website and in a newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction;
2. Ensure that each sign that designates a school zone is
proximate to a sign that:
A. Indicates that speed monitoring systems are in use in the
school zone; and
B. Is in accordance with the manual for and the specifications
for a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article;
3. With regard to a speed monitoring system established IN
A RESIDENTIAL DISTRICT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (VI)1 OF THIS PARAGRAPH, on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, based on proximity
to an institution of higher education under subparagraph (vi)3 of this paragraph, on
Interstate 83 in Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup
Road) between the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel
County–Howard County line, or at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road)
and Bonfield Avenue in Talbot County, ensure that all speed limit signs approaching and
within the segment of highway on which the speed monitoring system is located include
signs that:
A. Are in accordance with the manual and specifications for
a uniform system of traffic control devices adopted by the State Highway Administration
under § 25–104 of this article; and
B. Indicate that a speed monitoring system is in use; and

HOUSE BILL 644
4. With regard to a speed monitoring system placed on
Maryland Route 210 (Indian Head Highway) in Prince George’s County, Interstate 83 in
Baltimore City, in Anne Arundel County on Maryland Route 175 (Jessup Road) between
the Maryland Route 175/295 interchange and the Anne Arundel County–Howard County
line, or at the intersection of Maryland Route 333 (Oxford Road) and Bonfield Avenue in
Talbot County, ensure that each sign that indicates that a speed monitoring system is in
use is proximate to a device that displays a real–time posting of the speed at which a driver
is traveling.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.